Hawaii statutes.
[§659-10] Other actions. Nothing in
this chapter shall preclude the obtaining of relief available by quo warranto
by other appropriate action. [L 1972, c 90, §3(i); HRS §659-55; ren HRS
§659-10]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next